Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-411
Detainers for apprehension and detention; authorized; detention; limitations.

The chief executive officer of the Department of Health and Human Services shall have the authority, and may delegate the authority only to the Administrator of the Office of Juvenile Services and the superintendents of the youth rehabilitation and treatment centers, to issue detainers for the apprehension and detention of juveniles who have absconded from a placement with or commitment to the office. Any peace officer who detains a juvenile on such a detainer shall hold the juvenile in an appropriate facility or program for juveniles until the office can take custody of the juvenile.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1997, § 83-925.13;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 43;

Laws 1999, LB 522, § 1;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 110.